District of Columbia statutes.
4-410

Payments to child development homes and to in-home caregivers.

(a)

Payments to child development homes and to in-home caregivers shall be made according to the following rates:

(1)

For full care:

(A)

Child development homes shall receive $12 per day for each child.

(B)

In-home caregivers shall receive $7.25 per day for each child for care during the day and $8.25 per night for each child for night care.

(2)

For part-time care:

(A)

Child development homes shall receive $6 per day for each child for before and after school care.

(B)

In-home caregivers shall receive $5.75 per day for each child for before and after school care and $4 per night for each child for night care of less than 6 hours.

(a-1)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to establish differentiated payment rates for child development homes and in-home caregivers that reflect variations in the cost of providing services to children of different age groups which shall not be below the rates established pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(2) [sic] of this section.

(b)

The rates established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be adjusted by the Mayor through promulgation of a rule in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 11, 26 DCR 20
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-23, § 2, 30 DCR 3339
Dec. 16, 1987, D.C. Law 7-57, § 2(b), 34 DCR 7081
July 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-136, § 2(b), 35 DCR 4259
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-28, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4211
Apr. 7, 1995, D.C. Law 11-2, § 2(b), 42 DCR 1068
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 503(b), 42 DCR 3684
For temporary amendment of section, see § 503(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 503(b) of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Public Assistance and Day Care Policy Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-326, October 21, 1994, 41 DCR 7153).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Day Care Policy Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-319, August 4, 1994, 41 DCR 5367), § 2(b) of the Day Care Policy Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-330, October 21, 1994, 41 DCR 7162), and § 2(b) of the Day Care Policy Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-2, January 18, 1995, 42 DCR 539).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 103(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-69, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4945).
Section 301 of D.C. Act 9-37 provided that Section 103 shall apply as of October 1, 1990 and until the effective date of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 and beginning on the effective date of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 the rates for licensed child development centers, child development homes, and in-home caregivers in effect pursuant to the Day Care Policy Act shall revert to the rates in effect on September 1, 1990.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 103(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-37, May 17, 1991, 38 DCR 3390).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 503(b) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Public Assistance and Day Care Policy Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-208, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1568).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Day Care Policy Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-198, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1515).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 103(b) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).
1973 Ed., § 3-310.
1981 Ed., § 3-310.